Washington statutes.
RCW 2.42.010

Legislative declaration—Intent.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state to secure the constitutional rights of deaf persons and of other persons who, because of impairment of hearing or speech, are unable to readily understand or communicate the spoken English language, and who consequently cannot be fully protected in legal proceedings unless qualified interpreters are available to assist them.

It is the intent of the legislature in the passage of this chapter to provide for the appointment of such interpreters.

[ 1989 c 358 s 12; 1983 c 222 s 1; 1973 c 22 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 358: See note following RCW 2.43.010.